Florida, session 2026, SB848.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 62 63 Section 1.âSection 311.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to 64 read: 65 311.106âSeaport stormwater permitting and mitigation.â 66 (1)âA seaport listed in s. 403.021(9)(b) is authorized to 67 provide for onsite or offsite stormwater treatment for water 68 quality impacts caused by a proposed port activity that requires 69 a permit and that causes or contributes to pollution from 70 stormwater runoff. Offsite stormwater treatment may occur 71 outside of the established boundaries of the port, but must be 72 within the same drainage basin in which the port activity 73 occurs. A port offsite stormwater treatment project must be 74 constructed and maintained by the seaport or by the seaport in 75 conjunction with an adjacent local government. In order to limit 76 stormwater treatment from individual parcels within a port, a 77 seaport may provide for a regional stormwater treatment facility 78 that must be constructed and maintained by the seaport or by the 79 seaport in conjunction with an adjacent local government. 80 (2)âFor a proposed port activity with water quality impacts 81 that causes or contributes to pollution from stormwater runoff 82 from a seaport not listed in s. 403.021(9)(b), and not including 83 ports in Citrus or Putnam Counties, a regional stormwater 84 management system, as defined in s. 373.413(7)(a), operated by a 85 nonlocal governmental entity independently or under contract 86 with a seaport or local government, may not provide stormwater 87 treatment or achieve net improvement under s. 373.414(1)(b)3. 88 For a proposed port activity with water quality impacts that 89 causes or contributes to pollution from stormwater runoff from a 90 seaport not listed in s. 403.021(9)(b), and not including ports 91 in Citrus or Putnam Counties, a water quality enhancement area 92 as defined in s. 373.4134 and operated by a nonlocal 93 governmental entity independently or under contract with a 94 seaport or local government may not convey enhancement credits 95 to provide stormwater treatment or achieve net improvement under 96 s. 373.414(1)(b)3. 97 Section 2.âSubsections (23), (24), and (25) are added to 98 section 373.403, Florida Statutes, to read: 99 373.403âDefinitions.âWhen appearing in this part or in any 100 rule, regulation, or order adopted pursuant thereto, the 101 following terms mean: 102 (23)ââCompensating stormwater treatmentâ means a method of 103 stormwater treatment for discharges from multiple parcels. 104 (24)ââEnhancement creditâ means a standard unit of measure 105 that represents a quantity of pollutant removed by a water 106 quality enhancement area. 107 (25)ââPollutant reduction allocationâ means a standard unit 108 of measure that represents a quantity of pollutant removed by a 109 regional stormwater management system for purposes of providing 110 compensating stormwater treatment under the environmental 111 resource permitting program. 112 Section 3.âSubsection (7) is added to section 373.413, 113 Florida Statutes, to read: 114 373.413âPermits for construction or alteration.â 115 (7)âREGIONAL STORMWATER MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS.â 116 (a)âA âregional stormwater management systemâ is a method 117 of compensating stormwater treatment that creates pollution 118 reduction allocations and is designed, constructed, operated, 119 and maintained to collect, convey, store, absorb, inhibit, 120 treat, or harvest stormwater to prevent or reduce flooding, 121 overdrainage, environmental degradation and water pollution or 122 otherwise affect the quantity and quality of discharges within 123 the drainage area served by the regional system which is the 124 land or development that is served by or contributes stormwater 125 to the regional system. 126 (b)âAs part of meeting the requirement to demonstrate that 127 an applicant for an environmental resource permit for a regional 128 stormwater management system has the financial, legal, and 129 administrative capability of ensuring such regional stormwater 130 management system will be undertaken according to the terms and 131 conditions of an issued permit, the department or a water 132 management district shall require such applicant to provide 133 documentation of adequate financial responsibility. This 134 financial responsibility may consist of performance bonds, 135 letters of credit, insurance policies, trust agreements, or 136 similar, ensuring completion of construction; the amount of 137 which shall be based on cost estimates of completing the 138 construction; and an endowment or other long-term financial 139 assurance mechanism sufficient to ensure operation and 140 maintenance for the entire period the regional stormwater 141 management system is anticipated to be relied upon to provide 142 stormwater treatment, attenuation, or regulatory pollutant load 143 reduction allocations, the amount of which shall be based on 144 cost estimates of such long-term operation and maintenance. The 145 cost estimates and associated financial responsibility 146 mechanisms shall be updated every 5 years to reflect current 147 costs. This section shall not be construed to impose additional 148 financial responsibility requirements on stormwater management 149 systems that are not regional stormwater management systems. 150 (c)âAn environmental resource permit authorizing a regional 151 stormwater management system shall establish and include a 152 graphic depicting the drainage area to be served by such system. 153 Environmental resource permit applicants located within the 154 drainage area may purchase and use pollution reduction 155 allocations from a regional stormwater management system to meet 156 stormwater treatment performance criteria. The department or 157 water management district shall use Hydrologic Unit Code 12 (HUC 158 12) sub-basin as set forth by the United States Geological 159 Survey to establish the drainage area, unless the regional 160 stormwater management system applicant provides justification 161 demonstrating the proposed off-site area outside of the HUC 12 162 would provide the same degree of compensating treatment for a 163 common downstream receiving waterbody without causing or 164 contributing to any localized adverse impact to any downstream 165 waters, through modeling, other evaluations, or a combination 166 thereof. 167 Section 4.âPresent paragraphs (d) through (g) of subsection 168 (3) of section 373.4134, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 169 paragraphs (e) through (h), respectively, a new paragraph (d) is 170 added to that subsection, and paragraph (e) of subsection (1), 171 paragraph (b) of subsection (2), paragraph (b) of subsection 172 (3), subsection (5), paragraph (e) of subsection (7), and 173 subsection (9) of that section are amended, to read: 174 373.4134âWater quality enhancement areas.â 175 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â The Legislature finds 176 that: 177 (e)âWater quality enhancement areas that provide water 178 quality enhancement credits to applicants seeking permits under 179 ss. 373.403-373.443 and to governmental entities seeking to meet 180 an assigned basin management action plan allocation or 181 reasonable assurance plan under s. 403.067 are considered an 182 appropriate and permittable option. The use of an enhancement 183 credit as specified herein transfers the legal responsibility 184 for complying with the applicable regulatory water quality 185 treatment requirement from the purchaser and user of such 186 enhancement credit to the generator of such enhancement credit. 187 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 188 (b)ââEnhancement creditâ means a standard unit of measure 189 that represents a quantity of pollutant removed. 190 (3)âWATER QUALITY ENHANCEMENT AREAS.â 191 (b)âWater quality enhancement credits may be sold to and 192 used by governmental entities seeking to meet an assigned basin 193 management action plan allocation or reasonable assurance plan 194 or to permit applicants to meet environmental resource permit 195 stormwater treatment performance standards or to achieve for the 196 purpose of achieving net improvement or meeting environmental 197 resource permit performance standards under s. 373.414(1)(b)3. 198 after reasonable assurances have been provided for the design 199 and construction of all onsite stormwater management, as 200 required by law. 201 (d)âThe use of enhancement credits from a water quality 202 enhancement area constitutes compensating stormwater treatment 203 under the environmental resource permitting program. 204 (5)âWATER QUALITY ENHANCEMENT SERVICE AREA.âThe department 205 shall establish a water quality enhancement service area for 206 each water quality enhancement area. Enhancement credits may be 207 withdrawn and used only to address adverse impacts in the 208 enhancement service area. The boundaries of the enhancement 209 service area shall depend upon the geographic area in which the 210 water quality enhancement area could reasonably be expected to 211 address adverse impacts and must, at a minimum, consist of a 212 Hydrologic Unit Code 8 (HUC 8) sub-basin as set forth by the 213 United States Geological Survey. Enhancement service areas may 214 overlap, and enhancement service areas for two or more water 215 quality enhancement areas may be approved for a regional 216 watershed. 217 (7)âENHANCEMENT CREDITS.â 218 (e)âReductions in pollutant loading required under any 219 state regulatory program are not eligible to be considered as 220 enhancement credits. In addition, the term âcreditâ shall not be 221 used to refer to pollutant reduction achieved through 222 compensating stormwater treatment to meet environmental resource 223 permitting stormwater performance standards or as a mitigation 224 measure to achieve net improvement under s. 373.414(1)(b)3. 225 outside of enhancement credits generated from a water quality 226 enhancement area. 227 (9)âRULES.âThe department shall adopt rules to implement 228 this section which shall be filed for adoption no later than 229 October 1, 2026. This section may not be implemented until the 230 department adopts such rules. Pending the adoption of rules to 231 implement this section, the department shall accept, review and 232 take final agency action on applications for water quality 233 enhancement area provisional permits. The department shall issue 234 a water quality enhancement provisional permit in response to a 235 submitted application if the applicant provides reasonable 236 assurance of meeting the statutory criteria in this section. 237 Enhancement credits may be used from a water quality enhancement 238 area established under a provisional permit as provided in this 239 section subject to compliance with s. 373.4134 and the terms of 240 the provisional permit. Notwithstanding any other provision of 241 law or rule, the department or a water management district 242 reviewing an environmental resource permit application that 243 seeks to satisfy stormwater treatment performance standards or 244 achieve net improvement under s. 373.414(1)(b)3. shall allow the 245 use of enhancement credits from a water quality enhancement area 246 with a provisional permit pursuant to the terms of such 247 provisional permit. After the department adopts rules to 248 implement this section, the department may modify a water 249 quality enhancement area provisional permit to conform such 250 permit to such rules. Any enhancement credits used from a water 251 quality enhancement area established under a provisional permit 252 shall continue to be recognized by the department and water 253 management districts without change regardless of whether the 254 provisional permit is subsequently modified to conform to the 255 adopted rules. 256 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 257 373.414, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 258 373.414âAdditional criteria for activities in surface 259 waters and wetlands.â 260 (1)âAs part of an applicantâs demonstration that an 261 activity regulated under this part will not be harmful to the 262 water resources or will not be inconsistent with the overall 263 objectives of the district, the governing board or the 264 department shall require the applicant to provide reasonable 265 assurance that state water quality standards applicable to 266 waters as defined in s. 403.031 will not be violated and 267 reasonable assurance that such activity in, on, or over surface 268 waters or wetlands, as delineated in s. 373.421(1), is not 269 contrary to the public interest. However, if such an activity 270 significantly degrades or is within an Outstanding Florida 271 Water, as provided by department rule, the applicant must 272 provide reasonable assurance that the proposed activity will be 273 clearly in the public interest. 274 (b)âIf the applicant is unable to otherwise meet the 275 criteria set forth in this subsection, the governing board or 276 the department, in deciding to grant or deny a permit, must 277 consider measures proposed by or acceptable to the applicant to 278 mitigate adverse effects that may be caused by the regulated 279 activity. Such measures may include, but are not limited to, 280 onsite mitigation, offsite mitigation, offsite regional 281 mitigation, and the purchase of mitigation credits from 282 mitigation banks permitted under s. 373.4136. It is the 283 responsibility of the applicant to choose the form of 284 mitigation. The mitigation must offset the adverse effects 285 caused by the regulated activity. 286 1.âThe department or water management districts may accept 287 the donation of money as mitigation only where the donation is 288 specified for use in a duly noticed environmental creation, 289 preservation, enhancement, or restoration project, endorsed by 290 the department or the governing board of the water management 291 district, which offsets the impacts of the activity permitted 292 under this part. However, this subsection does not apply to 293 projects undertaken pursuant to s. 373.4137 or chapter 378. 294 Where a permit is required under this part to implement any 295 project endorsed by the department or a water management 296 district, all necessary permits must be have been issued before 297 prior to the acceptance of any cash donation. After the 298 effective date of this act, when money is donated to either the 299 department or a water management district to offset impacts 300 authorized by a permit under this part, the department or the 301 water management district shall accept only a donation that 302 represents the full cost to the department or water management 303 district of undertaking the project that is intended to mitigate 304 the adverse impacts. The full cost shall include all direct and 305 indirect costs, as applicable, such as those for land 306 acquisition, land restoration or enhancement, perpetual land 307 management, and general overhead consisting of costs such as 308 staff time, building, and vehicles. The department or the water 309 management district may use a multiplier or percentage to add to 310 other direct or indirect costs to estimate general overhead. 311 Mitigation credit for such a donation may be given only to the 312 extent that the donation covers the full cost to the agency of 313 undertaking the project intended to mitigate the adverse 314 impacts. However, nothing herein may be construed to prevent the 315 department or a water management district from accepting a 316 donation representing a portion of a larger project, provided 317 that the donation covers the full cost of that portion and 318 mitigation credit is given only for that portion. The department 319 or water management district may deviate from the full cost 320 requirements of this subparagraph to resolve a proceeding 321 brought pursuant to chapter 70 or a claim for inverse 322 condemnation. Nothing in This section may not be construed to 323 require the owner of a private mitigation bank, permitted under 324 s. 373.4136, to include the full cost of a mitigation credit in 325 the price of the credit to a purchaser of such said credit. 326 2.âThe department and each water management district shall 327 report by March 1 of each year, as part of the consolidated 328 annual report required by s. 373.036(7), all cash donations 329 accepted under subparagraph 1. during the preceding water 330 management district fiscal year for wetland mitigation purposes. 331 The report must exclude those contributions pursuant to s. 332 373.4137. The report must include a description of the endorsed 333 mitigation projects and, except for projects governed by s. 334 373.4135(6), must address, as applicable, success criteria, 335 project implementation status and timeframe, monitoring, long 336 term management, provisions for preservation, and full cost 337 accounting. 338 3.âIf the applicant is unable to meet water quality 339 standards because existing ambient water quality does not meet 340 standards, the governing board or the department must consider 341 mitigation measures, such as compensating stormwater treatment 342 as defined in s. 373.403(23), proposed by or acceptable to the 343 applicant that cause net improvement of the water quality in the 344 receiving body of water for those parameters which do not meet 345 standards. 346 4.âIf mitigation requirements imposed by a local government 347 for surface water and wetland impacts of an activity regulated 348 under this part cannot be reconciled with mitigation 349 requirements approved under a permit for the same activity 350 issued under this part, including application of the uniform 351 wetland mitigation assessment method adopted pursuant to 352 subsection (18), the mitigation requirements for surface water 353 and wetland impacts are controlled by the permit issued under 354 this part. 355 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 356 made by this act to section 373.414, Florida Statutes, in a 357 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 358 373.4136, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 359 373.4136âEstablishment and operation of mitigation banks.â 360 (6)âMITIGATION SERVICE AREA.âThe department or water 361 management district shall establish a mitigation service area 362 for each mitigation bank permit. The department or water 363 management district shall notify and consider comments received 364 on the proposed mitigation service area from each local 365 government within the proposed mitigation service area. Except 366 as provided in this section, mitigation credits may be withdrawn 367 and used only to offset adverse impacts in the mitigation 368 service area. The boundaries of the mitigation service area 369 shall depend upon the geographic area where the mitigation bank 370 could reasonably be expected to offset adverse impacts. 371 Mitigation service areas may overlap, and mitigation service 372 areas for two or more mitigation banks may be approved for a 373 regional watershed. 374 (d)âIf the provisions of s. 373.414(1)(b) and (8) are met 375 and an insufficient number or type of credits from banks whose 376 permitted service area overlays in whole or in part the regional 377 watershed in which the impacts occur, the permit applicant is 378 entitled to a one-time use of credits released from a mitigation 379 bank outside the mitigation bank service area to offset impacts 380 pursuant to s. 373.414(1)(b), as established by the procedure in 381 paragraph (f). The department or water management district must 382 have determined that the mitigation service area lacked the 383 appropriate credit type. Priority must be given to mitigation 384 banks whose permitted service area fully includes the impacted 385 site. If the number of released credits within a mitigation 386 service area only partially offsets the impacts associated with 387 a proposed project in the mitigation service area, the permit 388 applicant may only use out-of-service-area credits to account 389 for the difference between the released credits available in the 390 mitigation bank service area and the credits required to offset 391 the impacts associated with the proposed project. In 392 implementing this subsection, the department and water 393 management districts shall apply a proximity factor to determine 394 adequate compensatory mitigation as follows: 395 1.âA 1.0 multiplier shall be applied for use of in-kind 396 credits within the service area. 397 2.âA 1.0 multiplier shall be applied for use of in-kind and 398 out-of-service-area credits when the service area overlays part 399 of the same regional watershed as the proposed impacts only 400 after credit deficiency has been established by the procedure 401 set forth in paragraph (f). 402 3.âA 1.2 multiplier shall be applied for use of in-kind and 403 out-of-service-area credits located within a regional watershed 404 immediately adjacent to the regional watershed overlain by a 405 bank service area in which proposed impacts are located only 406 after credit deficiency has been established by the procedure 407 set forth in paragraph (f). 408 4.âWhen in-kind credits are not available to offset impacts 409 in the regional watershed immediately adjacent to the regional 410 watershed overlain by a mitigation bank service area in which 411 the proposed impacts are located, an additional 0.25 multiplier 412 shall be applied for each additional regional watershed boundary 413 crossed only after credit deficiency has been established by the 414 procedure set forth in paragraph (f). 415 5.âAn additional 0.50 multiplier shall be applied after any 416 multipliers required in subparagraphs 1.-4., if the mitigation 417 used to offset impacts entails out-of-kind replacement. 418 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.